California statutes. Elections Code
 at the time prescribed in subdivision (a) as to the type of districts that may be used to select delegates and the number of delegates that may be selected from each district in connection with the presidential primary. The number of delegates and alternates that may be selected from each district shall be based on a formula adopted by the Democratic Party of California in compliance with the standing rules and bylaws of the Democratic National Committee for the national convention where the nominee of the Democratic Party for President of the United States will be selected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 190, Sec. 5.   (AB 1689)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6023.

The notification of the number of delegates and alternate delegates shall be in substantially the following form:Statement of Number of Delegates and Alternate Delegates to Democratic National Convention and of Number of Delegates and Alternate Delegates to Be Selected from ____ DistrictsTo the Secretary of State

Sacramento, California
You are hereby notified that the number of delegates and alternate delegates to represent the State of California in the next national convention of the Democratic Party is ____.

You are hereby notified that the number of delegates which may be selected from all ____ districts as a part of the delegation to the national convention of the Democratic Party is as follows:
District No. 1.__ delegates __ alternates.

District No. 2.__ delegates __ alternates.

District No. 3.__ delegates __ alternates.

(Followed by the remaining districts).
You are hereby notified that the categories and number of delegates, other than those selected by ____ districts, are as follows:

Category ____. ____ Delegates. ____ Alternates.

(Followed by the remaining categories and number of delegates and alternates).
Dated this ____ day of ____, 20__.Chairperson of the State Central Committee ofthe Democratic Party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 190, Sec. 7.   (AB 1689)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6024.

If the Chairperson of the Democratic State Central Committee fails to file the notice required by Section 6020 with the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall ascertain the total number of delegates from the call for the national convention issued by the Democratic National Committee and shall compute the number of delegates that may be selected from each district based on a formula specified by the Democratic National
 Committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 190, Sec. 8.   (AB 1689)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Selection of Candidates by the Secretary of State [6040. - 6043.]

6040.

This article shall apply to the designation of candidates by the Secretary of State for placement only on the presidential primary ballot.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6041.

The Secretary of State shall place the name of a candidate upon the presidential primary ballot when the Secretary of State has determined that the candidate is generally advocated for or recognized throughout the United States or California as actively seeking the nomination of the Democratic Party for President of the United States. The Secretary of State shall include as criteria for selecting candidates the fact of qualifying for funding under the Federal Elections Campaign Act of 1974, as amended.

On or before the 88th day preceding a presidential primary election, the Secretary of State shall publicly announce and distribute to the news media for publication a list of the selected candidates that the Secretary of State intends to place on the ballot at the following presidential primary
 election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 5.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6042.

When the Secretary of State decides to place the name of a candidate on the ballot pursuant to Section 6041, he or she shall notify the candidate that the candidate’s name will appear on the ballot of this state in the presidential primary election.

The secretary shall also notify the candidate that the candidate may withdraw his or her name from the list of recognized candidates by
 filing with the Secretary of State an affidavit pursuant to Section 6043 no later than the 68th day before the presidential primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 190, Sec. 10.   (AB 1689)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6043.

If a selected candidate or an unselected candidate files with the Secretary of State, no later than the time specified in Section 6042, an affidavit stating without qualification that he or she is not now a candidate for the office of President of the United States, and stating that similar documents, also without qualification, have been or will be timely filed, where applicable, with the appropriate public election official in all other states holding open presidential primaries, that candidate’s name shall be omitted from the list of names certified by the
 Secretary of State to the county elections officials for the ballot and his or her name shall not appear on the ballot.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Qualification of Candidates and Uncommitted Delegations [6060. - 6061.]

6060.

This article shall apply to the qualification for placement on the presidential primary ballot of candidates who are not selected candidates as referred to in Section 6041, and each group, consisting of at least seven voters of the state who are registered as affiliated with the Democratic Party, proposing the selection of delegates expressing no preference for a candidate for President, hereinafter referred to as an “uncommitted delegation.” The additional candidates who qualify under this article shall hereinafter be referred to as unselected
 candidates.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6061.

Any unselected candidate or uncommitted delegation desiring to be placed on the presidential primary ballot shall have nomination papers circulated on behalf of the candidacy. In order to qualify for placement on the presidential primary ballot, the candidate’s or uncommitted delegation’s nomination papers shall be signed by voters registered as affiliated with the Democratic Party equal in number to not less than 1 percent or 500, whichever is fewer, in each congressional district of the number of persons registered as members of the Democratic Party in the
 report of registration issued by the Secretary of State on the 135th day preceding the presidential primary election.

The unselected candidates or uncommitted delegations shall meet the statewide signature requirements from each congressional district in order to be eligible for placement on the ballot in any one congressional district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 913, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Steering Committees [6080. - 6082.]

6080.

Each candidate who seeks to qualify under Article 4 (commencing with Section 6060) and each group proposing an uncommitted delegation shall appoint a steering committee of seven members and shall appoint one of the members to serve as the chairperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 190, Sec. 11.   (AB 1689)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6081.

The chairperson of a steering committee, at least 82 days prior to the presidential primary, shall file with the Secretary of State a statement containing the names and addresses of the members of the steering committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 791, Sec. 6.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

6082.

Each steering committee shall be responsible for the circulation of nomination papers of candidates who seek to qualify under Article 4 (commencing with Section 6060) and groups proposing uncommitted delegations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 190, Sec. 12.   (AB 1689)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Nomination Papers [6101. - 6108.]

6101.

Nomination papers to be circulated pursuant to Section 6061 shall be prepared, circulated, signed, and verified and shall be left for examination with the county elections official of the county in which they are circulated at least 81 days prior to the presidential primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 6.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6102.

Upon the filing of nomination papers pursuant to Section 6061 signed by the required number of voters, the candidate or uncommitted delegation named in the papers shall be eligible to select a delegation for placement on the ballot which shall be voted upon in the presidential primary election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6103.

Upon receipt of a sufficient number of signatures for the presidential primary ballot, the Secretary of State shall notify the chairperson of the steering committee of each unselected candidate or uncommitted delegation of that fact and advise him or her that no more signatures will be received.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6104.

Each signer of a nomination paper may sign only one paper. Each signer shall print his or her name, indicate his or her place of residence, and declare his or her intention to support the candidate or delegation named on the nomination paper.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6105.

Any nomination paper may be presented in sections. Each section shall contain the name of the candidate or chairperson of the steering committee in the case of uncommitted delegations. Each section shall bear the name of the county in which it is circulated. Only voters of the county whose affidavits of registration declare the Democratic Party as their party affiliation are competent to sign.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 190, Sec. 17.   (AB 1689)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6106.

Each section shall be prepared with the lines for signatures numbered, and shall have attached the affidavit of the circulator who obtained signatures to it, which shall meet all of the requirements of Section 104. No other affidavit is required. The affidavit of any circulator shall be verified free of charge by any officer authorized to administer oaths.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 3.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6107.

A verified nomination paper is prima facie evidence that the signatures are genuine and that the persons signing it are voters, until it is otherwise proved by comparison of the signatures with the affidavits of registration in the office of the county elections official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6108.

The nomination paper for the presidential primary ballot shall be in substantially the following form:SECTION OF NOMINATION PAPER SIGNED BY VOTER ON 
BEHALF OF A PRESIDENTIAL CANDIDATE OR 
 UNCOMMITTED DELEGATESection _________Page _____County of ______________. Nomination paper of a candidate or uncommitted delegation for the presidential primary ballot.State of CaliforniaCounty of ⎱
 ⎰ss.SIGNER’S STATEMENTI, the undersigned, am a voter of the County of ____, State of California, and am registered as affiliated with the Democratic Party. I hereby nominate ____ for the presidential primary to be held on the ____ day of ____, 20__. I have not signed the nomination paper of any other candidate or uncommitted delegation,
 and I further declare that I intend to support the candidate or uncommitted delegation named herein.NumberSignaturePrinted nameResidence 1. 2. 3. etc. CIRCULATOR’S AFFIDAVITI, ____________, solemnly swear (or affirm) all of the following:1.That I am 18 years of age or older.2.That my residence address, including street and number, is
.
 [If no street or number exists, a designation of my residence adequate to readily ascertain its location is
______________________________________________________________.]

3.That I secured signatures in the
 County of ____________ to the nomination paper of a candidate or uncommitted delegation for the presidential primary ballot named in the signer’s statement above; that all the signatures on this section of the nomination paper numbered from 1 to ___, inclusive, were made in my presence, and that to the best of my knowledge and belief each signature is the genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be. The signatures were obtained between ____________, 20___, and ____________, 20____. (Signed)CirculatorSubscribed and sworn to before me this ____ day of ____, 20____.(SEAL)Notary Public (or other official)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 4.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Circulators [6122. - 6123.]

6122.

Circulators may obtain signatures to the nomination paper for which they were appointed at any time between the period of 120 days and 81 days, inclusive, prior to the presidential primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 7.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6123.

A county elections official or his or her deputy may not circulate a nomination paper and circulators may not obtain signatures within 100 feet of any election booth or polling place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 790, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Arrangement and Examination of Nomination Papers [6140. - 6146.]

6140.

Each section of a nomination paper, after being verified, shall be returned by the circulator who circulated it to the steering committee, or to its duly authorized representatives. All the sections circulated in any county shall be collected by the steering committee, or its duly authorized representatives, and they shall arrange and leave the sections with the county elections official for examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 790, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6141.

Prior to filing, the sections of a nomination paper shall be numbered in order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6142.

Nomination papers, properly assembled, may be consolidated and fastened together by counties, but nomination papers signed by voters in different counties shall not be fastened together.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6143.

The county elections official shall examine all nomination papers left with him or her for examination and shall disregard and mark “not sufficient” the name of any voter of his or her county which does not appear in the same handwriting on an affidavit of registration in the office of the county elections official. The county elections official shall also disregard and mark “not sufficient” the name of any voter of his or her county who has not stated his or her intention to affiliate with the Democratic Party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6144.

Within five days after any nomination papers are left with him or her for examination, the county elections official shall:

(a) Examine and affix to them a certificate reciting that he or she has examined them and stating the number of names which have not been marked “not sufficient.”

(b) Transmit the papers with the certificate of examination to the Secretary of State, who shall file the papers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6145.

The county elections official’s certificate to nomination papers shall be in substantially the following form: Certificate of County Elections Official to Nomination PapersTo the Secretary of State:
I, Elections Official of the County of ____________, hereby certify that I have examined the nomination papers to which this certificate is attached, of the candidate or uncommitted delegation, as the case may be, for purposes of qualifying for placement on the ballot at the ensuing presidential primary, that the number of names which I have not marked “not sufficient” is ______________.
Dated this ____________ day of ____________, 20____.____________________, County Elections Official(SEAL)By , Deputy

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 190, Sec. 20.   (AB 1689)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6146.

No filing fee shall be required from any person in order to file nomination papers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Notification of Qualification from Secretary of State [6160. - 6160.]

6160.

At least 68 days before a presidential primary, the Secretary of State shall notify each steering committee whether or not it has qualified a candidate or uncommitted delegation for placement on the ballot pursuant to Section 6060.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 190, Sec. 21.   (AB 1689)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Certified List of Candidates and Uncommitted Delegations, Notice of Election [6180. - 6180.]

6180.

At least 68 days before a presidential primary election, the Secretary of State shall transmit to each county elections official a certified list containing the name of each candidate who is entitled to be voted for on the ballot at the presidential primary, and the name of each chairperson of a steering committee of an uncommitted delegation who is to be voted for on the same ballot.

The certified list shall be in substantially the following form:Certified List of Presidential Candidates and Uncommitted Delegations
 To the County Elections Official of ________ County:
I, ________, Secretary of State, do hereby certify that the following list contains the name of each person who is entitled to be voted for as a candidate of the Democratic Party at the presidential primary election to be held on the ________ day of ____, 20__, and the name of each chairperson of a steering committee of an uncommitted delegation which is entitled to be voted for on the ballot.List of Presidential Candidates and Uncommitted DelegationsLinda Adams
Joseph Black
John Reardon
Unpledged delegation
Paul Minor,
ChairpersonDated at Sacramento, California, this ________ day of ________, 20____.(SEAL) Secretary of State

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 190, Sec. 22.   (AB 1689)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Canvass of Returns and Certificate of Selection [6220. - 6222.]

6220.

The Secretary of State shall, not later than the 32nd day after the election, compile and file in his or her office a statement of the canvassed returns filed with him or her by the county elections officials.

The compiled statement shall show for each candidate and uncommitted delegation the total of the votes received, and the votes received in each county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 55, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6222.

No fee shall be required of any person as a condition of receiving a certificate of selection as a delegate or an alternate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Write-in Candidates [6240. - 6241.]

6240.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a space shall be provided on the presidential primary ballot for a voter to write in the name of a candidate for nomination by the Democratic Party for President of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 190, Sec. 24.   (AB 1689)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6241.

Any person who believes his or her name may be used as a write-in candidate for nomination by the Democratic Party for President of the United States shall, not later than 21 days before the primary election, file for endorsement of his or her write-in candidacy with the Secretary of State, or no votes shall be counted for him or her.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 190, Sec. 25.   (AB 1689)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Republican Presidential Primary [6300. - 6480.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6300. - 6300.]

6300.

(a) This chapter shall be applicable only to the presidential primary ballot of the Republican Party, and qualified parties for which no other provisions apply.

(b) This chapter shall be applicable to the selection of delegates to the Republican Party National Convention to the extent that the constitution, bylaws, and rules of the Republican Party do not provide otherwise. The California Republican Party shall notify the Secretary of State of any material changes in the
 constitution, bylaws, and rules of the Republican Party relating to the selection of delegates to the Republican Party National Convention.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 159, Sec. 1.   Effective July 23, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Number and Certification of Delegates [6320. - 6323.]

6320.

The chairperson of the state central committee shall notify the Secretary of State on or before the 120th day preceding the presidential primary as to the number of delegates to represent the state in the next national convention of his or her party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 913, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

6321.

The notification of the number of delegates shall be in substantially the following form:STATEMENT OF NUMBER OF DELEGATES TO THE 
 REPUBLICAN PARTY NATIONAL CONVENTIONTo the Secretary of StateSacramento, CaliforniaYou are hereby notified that the number of delegates to represent the State of California in the next national convention of the Republican Party is ____.Dated this ________ day of ________, 20__Chairperson of the State Central Committee
 of the Republican Party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 58, Sec. 3.   (AB 3259)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6322.

If the chairperson of the state central committee fails to file a notice as to the number of delegates, the Secretary of State shall ascertain the number from the call for the national convention issued by the national committee of the party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6323.

The Secretary of State shall, on or before the 110th day preceding the presidential primary, certify to the county elections official of each county the number of delegates to be elected by the Republican Party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 913, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Selection of Candidates by the Secretary of State [6340. - 6343.]

6340.

(a) The Secretary of State shall place the name of a candidate upon the Republican presidential primary ballot when the Secretary of State has determined that the candidate is generally advocated for or recognized throughout the United States or California as a candidate for the nomination of the Republican Party for President of the United States.

(b) On or before the 88th day preceding a presidential primary election the Secretary of State shall publicly announce and distribute to the news media for publication a list of the candidates the Secretary of State intends to place on the ballot at the following presidential primary election. Following this announcement the Secretary of State may add candidates to the Secretary of
 State’s selection, but the Secretary of State shall not delete any candidate whose name appears on the announced list.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 8.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6341.

When the Secretary of State decides to place the name of a candidate on the ballot pursuant to Section 6340, he or she shall notify the candidate that his or her name will appear on the ballot of this state in the presidential primary election.

The secretary shall also notify the candidate that he or she may withdraw his or her name from the ballot by filing with the Secretary of State an affidavit pursuant to Section 6342 no later than the 68th day before that election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 312, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6342.

If a selected candidate or a nonselected candidate files with the Secretary of State, no later than the 68th day before the presidential primary, an affidavit stating without qualification that he or she is not now a candidate for the office of President of the United States at the forthcoming presidential primary election, his or her name shall be omitted from the list of names certified by the Secretary of State to the county elections officials for the ballot and his or her name shall not appear on the presidential primary ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 312, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6343.

Any unselected candidate desiring to have his or her name placed on the presidential primary ballot shall have nomination papers circulated in his or her behalf. In order to qualify his or her name for placement on the presidential primary ballot, the candidate’s nomination papers shall be signed by voters registered as affiliated with the Republican Party equal in number to not less than 1 percent of the number of persons registered as members of the Republican Party, as reflected in the report of registration issued by the Secretary of State on the 135th day
 preceding the presidential primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 913, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Nomination Papers [6360. - 6365.]

6360.

Nomination papers properly prepared, circulated, signed, and verified shall be left for examination with the county elections official of the county in which they are circulated at least 81 days prior to the presidential primary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 109.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6361.

Each signer of a nomination paper may sign only one paper. He or she shall declare his or her intention to support the candidate for nomination, add his or her place of residence, and give his or her street and number if any.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6362.

Any nomination paper may be presented in sections. Each section shall contain the names of the candidate. Each section shall bear the name of the county in which it is circulated. Only voters of the county registered as intending to affiliate with the political party by which the nominations are to be made are competent to sign.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6363.

Each section shall be prepared with the lines for signatures numbered, and shall have attached the affidavit of the circulator who obtained signatures to it, which shall meet all of the requirements of Section 104. No other affidavit is required. The affidavit of any circulator shall be verified free of charge by any officer authorized to administer oaths.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 5.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

6364.

A verified nomination paper is prima facie evidence that the signatures are genuine and that the persons signing it are voters, until it is otherwise proved by comparison of the signatures with the affidavits of registration in the office of the county elections official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6365.

The nomination paper for a candidate shall be in substantially the following form:SECTION OF NOMINATION PAPER SIGNED BY VOTER ON 
BEHALF OF CANDIDATESection ____________Page ____________County of __________. Nomination paper for ____________ as presidential nominee of the Republican Party.State of CaliforniaCounty of ⎱
 ⎰ss.SIGNER’S STATEMENTI, the undersigned, am a voter of the County of ____________, State of California, and am registered as intending to affiliate with the Republican Party. I have not signed the nomination paper of any other candidates for the same office, and further declare that I intend to support the nomination of the candidate named herein at
 the Republican Party presidential primary to be held on the ____________ day of ____________, 20____.NumberSignaturePrinted nameResidence 1. 2. 3. etc. CIRCULATOR’S AFFIDAVITI, ________, solemnly swear (or affirm) all of the following:1.That I am 18 years of age or older.2.That my residence address, including street and number, is
.
 [If no street or number exists, a designation of my residence adequate to readily ascertain its location is
.]

3.That I secured signatures in the County of ________ to the nomination paper of the candidate named in the signer’s statement above as candidate for nomination by the Republican Party at its presidential primary election; that all the signatures on this section of the nomination paper numbered from 1 to ____________, inclusive, were made in my presence, that the signatures were obtained between ____________, 20__, and ____________, 20__, and that to the best of my knowledge and belief each signature is the genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be. (Signed)CirculatorSubscribed and sworn to before me this ____________ day of ____________, 20 ____.(SEAL)Notary Public (or other official)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 6.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Circulators [6382. - 6383.]

6382.

Circulators may obtain signatures to the nomination paper of a candidate at any time not more than 120 nor less than 81 days prior to the presidential primary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 10.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6383.

A county elections official or deputy county elections official may not circulate a nomination paper. Circulators may not obtain signatures within 100 feet of any election booth or polling place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 790, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Arrangement and Examination of Nomination Papers [6400. - 6406.]

6400.

Each section of a nomination paper shall be returned by the circulator who circulated it to the candidate or his or her designee. All the sections circulated in any county shall be collected by the candidate or his or her designee and he or she shall arrange and leave the sections with the county elections official for examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 790, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.

Prior to filing, the sections of a nomination paper for a candidate shall be numbered in order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6402.

Nomination papers, properly assembled, may be consolidated and fastened together by counties, but nomination papers signed by voters in different counties shall not be thus fastened together.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6403.

The county elections official shall examine all nomination papers left with him or her for examination and shall disregard and mark “not sufficient” the name of any voter of his or her county which does not appear in the same handwriting on an affidavit of registration in the office of the county elections official. He or she shall also disregard and mark “not sufficient” the name of any voter of his or her county who has not stated his or her intention to affiliate with the Republican Party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6404.

Within five days after any nomination papers are left with him or her for examination, the county elections official shall:

(a) Examine and affix to them a certificate reciting that he or she has examined them and stating the number of names which have not been marked “not sufficient.”

(b) Transmit the papers with the certificate of examination to the Secretary of State, who shall file the papers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6405.

The county elections official’s certificate to nomination papers of a candidate shall be in substantially the following form:COUNTY ELECTION OFFICIAL’S CERTIFICATE TO NOMINATION
PAPERS OF A CANDIDATETo the Secretary of State:I, County Elections Official of the County of _____________, hereby certify that I have examined the nomination papers, to which this
 certificate is attached, of the candidate for the ensuing presidential primary, and that the number of names which I have not marked “not sufficient” is ______________.The candidate named in the nomination papers is ______________.Dated this ____________ day of ____________, 20____.________________________ , County Elections OfficialBy____________________ , Deputy

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 58, Sec. 4.   (AB 3259)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6406.

No filing fee is required from any person to be voted for at a presidential primary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Canvass of Returns. Certificate of Election [6420. - 6422.]

6420.

The Secretary of State shall, not later than the 32nd day after the election, compile and file in his or her office a statement of the canvassed returns filed with him or her by the county elections officials.

The compiled statement shall show for each candidate the total of the votes received and the votes received in each county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 55, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6421.

The Secretary of State shall, not later than the 32nd day after the election, issue a certificate of election to the candidate who received the largest vote cast of that party, that person thereby being the party’s presidential nominee candidate from California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 55, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6422.

The Secretary of State shall, not later than the 32nd day after the election, issue a certification to each person selected as a delegate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 55, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Write-in Candidates [6440. - 6443.]

6440.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a space shall be provided on the presidential primary ballot for an elector to write in the name of a candidate for President of the United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6441.

Any person who believes his or her name may be used as a write-in candidate for President of the United States shall, not later than 21 days before the primary election, file his or her endorsement of his or her write-in candidacy with the Secretary of State, or no votes shall be counted for him or her.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6442.

Any person who receives, by write-in vote, a plurality of the votes cast for President of the United States shall, within 10 days after the primary election, file a list of delegates to the national convention of his or her political party with the Secretary of State in the manner prescribed in Section 6471.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6443.

If the candidate fails to file a list of delegates, the state central committee of the party in whose primary the candidate received the plurality vote shall, within 10 days of the end of the 10-day period required in Section 6442, file a list of delegates with the Secretary of State. The delegation shall go to the convention unpledged to any candidate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Selection of Delegates [6460. - 6461.]

6460.

Every candidate whether selected pursuant to Section 6340, or unselected as referred to in Section 6343, who wishes to have a delegation of electors pledged to his or her candidacy in accordance with the result of the presidential preference primary or who wishes to have an official California delegation at the Republican National Convention shall form a delegation in compliance with Section 6461.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6461.

(a) The delegation of each candidate shall be composed as follows:

(1) Seventy-eight percent of the delegation, or the nearest whole number thereto which provides for a total number of district delegates equal to at least three times the number of congressional districts within the state, shall be composed of three delegates selected for each congressional district.

(2) The remainder of the delegation shall be
 composed of delegates selected at large from throughout the state.

The names of the persons chosen as delegates shall be submitted to the Secretary of State, by the candidate or his or her designee, no later than 30 days before the presidential primary election for certification.

(b) There shall be no more than one alternate per delegate. Alternates shall be appointed by the candidate or his or her designee and shall be appointed by congressional districts, the number per congressional district to be no less than three. Such alternates shall be submitted to the Secretary of State within 30 days after the primary for certification.

(c) Each delegate to the Republican National Convention shall use his or her best efforts at the convention for the party’s presidential nominee candidate from California to whom the delegate has pledged support